New Jersey, session 221, A1468.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1981, c.249 (C.58:4-8.2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    The Commissioner of Environmental Protection shall, by rule adopted pursuant to the provisions of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), establish a periodic dam safety inspection and reporting procedure, on an annual or longer term basis, for the owner of any dam meeting the criteria contained in R.S.58:4-1.  The owner shall have a professional engineer inspect the dam and prepare and submit a report containing such information as the commissioner may require, concerning the safety of said dam and appurtenant structures. Every dam which raises the waters of any stream more than 70 feet above its usual mean low-water height or which impounds more than 10,000 acre-feet of water shall be inspected on an annual basis by a professional engineer retained by the owner, in the company of a professional engineer assigned from the Department of Environmental Protection.  As a component of the dam safety inspection and reporting procedure adopted pursuant to this section, the department shall adopt a classification system for the hazard potential of dams, which shall take into account potential loss of life, property damage, and impacts to natural resources, including, but not limited to, wildlife, fish, aquatic life, habitat, plants, and historic or archeological resources. (cf: P.L.1981, c.249, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.